Arkansas, session 2025, HB1866.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 21, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-21-122. Eli's Law — Audio recording device — Required in certain
locations.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as "Eli's Law".
(b)(1) To ensure the safety of each student, beginning with the 2027-
2028 school year, each public school district and open-enrollment public
charter school shall install an audio recording device in each locker room
and changing room located on the public school district's or open-enrollment
public charter school's property.
(2) Each public school district and open-enrollment public
charter school shall post in a conspicuous place in each locker room and
changing room located on the public school district's or open-enrollment
*TNL049*
04-09-2025 14:46:53 TNL049

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 S4/9/25 HB1866
public charter school's property a sign that notifies individuals of the
presence of an audio recording device in the locker room or changing room.
(c)(1) A public school district or open-enrollment public charter
school shall not:
(A) Destroy an audio recording created by the devices
installed under subsection (b) of this section for a minimum of ninety (90)
days after the date on which the audio recording was created; and
(B) Maintain an audio recording created by the devices
installed under subsection (b) of this section for longer than twelve (12)
months from the date on which the audio recording was made unless there has
been an allegation of wrongdoing for which the audio recording may be used as
evidence.
(2) At least ten (10) days before the destruction of an audio
recording obtained under subsection (b) of this section, the public school
district or open-enrollment public charter school shall publish a notice of
intent to destroy the audio recording on the public school district's or
open-enrollment public charter school's website.
(d) An audio recording created by the devices under subsection (b) of
this section may be requested only by:
(1) A public school district or an open-enrollment public
charter school administrator; or
(2) A parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco
parentis to a student who presents an allegation of wrongdoing for which the
audio recording may be used as evidence.
(e) A public school district or open-enrollment public charter school
may use available state funding to implement the requirements under this
section, including without limitation funds set aside by the General Assembly
for school safety.

/s/Brooks






04-09-2025 14:46:53 TNL049